Utah statutes.
17-36-26.   Increase in budgetary fund or general fund -- Public hearing.

(1) Before the governing body may, by resolution, increase a budget appropriation of any budgetary fund, increase the budget of the general fund, or make an amendment to a budgetary fund or the general fund, the governing body shall hold a public hearing giving all interested parties an opportunity to be heard.

(2)  Notice of the public hearing described in Subsection (1) shall be published at least five days before the day of the hearing:

(a) (i)  in at least one issue of a newspaper generally circulated in the county; or

(ii)  if there is not a newspaper generally circulated in the county, the hearing may be published by posting notice in three conspicuous places within the county; and

(b)  on the Utah Public Notice Website created under Section 63F-1-701.



Amended by Chapter 90, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 116, 2010 General Session

